Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 2 Contractors or Materialmen
§ 29-2-106.
When statement lien to be filed; rights of subcontractor not abridged by contract between owner and contractor; agreement to extend filing period.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any contractor asserting a lien under this chapter shall file his lien statement within one hundred fifty (150) days and every other person asserting a lien under this chapter shall file within one hundred twenty (120) days:

Of the earlier of:

After the last day when work was performed or materials furnished under contract;

From the date of substantial completion of the project on which work was performed or materials were furnished under contract; or

With respect to a subcontractor, after the last day he performed work at the direction of the contractor or other person authorized to provide direction.

No contract made between the record owner and the contractor shall be construed to affect or restrict the right of any subcontractor or materialman to file a lien.

The record owner may record a notice of substantial completion of the project in the records of the county clerk in the county where the project is located. If a notice of substantial completion of the project is recorded under this subsection, the date the notice is recorded shall be presumed to be the date of substantial completion of the project. After the notice has been duly recorded, the record owner shall send a copy of the notice within five (5) days to all contractors, subcontractors and materialmen who provided the record owner with preliminary notice pursuant to W.S.

29-2-112

. The notice shall not extend the date by which a lien statement shall be filed as may otherwise be provided in this section. The time to file a lien statement by any contractor, subcontractor or materialman shall not be affected if the record owner fails to send the notice of substantial completion of the project.

The notice of substantial completion of the project shall refer to this section, provide the date of substantial completion of the project on the notice and state in bold face type: “This notice creates a rebuttable presumption that the period for filing a lien shall begin to run as of the date the notice was recorded. If the recipient of the notice has not been paid in full, any lien to be filed on the property to secure full payment shall be filed by contractors within one hundred fifty (150) days of the date the notice was recorded and within one hundred twenty (120) days of the date the notice was recorded for materialmen.”

Any party to a contract for which a lien may be filed may agree to an extension of the time within which the lien may be filed. The time agreed upon may not exceed twice the time within which the lien would have to be filed in accordance with subsection (a) of this section. The agreement shall be acknowledged before a notarial officer, and signed by the owner, the contractor and any other parties to the contract before it is valid. The agreement shall be filed with and recorded by the county clerk in the manner provided by W.S.

29-1-312

for a lien statement. The lien rights of persons not signing the agreement are not affected by it.

A cooperative utility claiming a lien under W.S. 29-2-101(d) shall file its lien statement within one hundred eighty (180) days after the first date the provisions of W.S. 29-2-101(d)(i) and (ii) were met. The cooperative utility and its member may agree to an extension of the time in which the lien may be filed, but the agreement may not exceed a total time for filing the lien statement beyond three hundred sixty (360) days. Any agreement for an extension under this subsection shall otherwise comply with the requirements of subsection (e) of this section.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 78, § 5; 1886, ch. 25, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1521; Laws 1897, ch. 20, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2893; C.S. 1910, § 3803; C.S. 1920, § 4866; R.S. 1931, § 66-508; C.S. 1945, § 55-205; W.S. 1957, § 29-11; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-109

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2007, ch. 193, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

Cross references. —

See also §

29-2-109

and cross references thereunder.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in the third sentence of (c).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any” for “Every,” inserted “asserting a lien under this chapter” twice, substituted “one hundred fifty (150) days” for “one hundred twenty (120) days,” and substituted “one hundred twenty (120) days” for “ninety (90) days”; inserted “Of the earlier of:” in the introductory language of (a)(i); inserted (a)(i)(A) designation and redesignated former (a)(ii) and (a)(iii) as (a)(i)(B) and (a)(ii); in (a)(i)(B), inserted “of substantial completion of the project on which” and substituted “performed or materials were furnished under contract” for “substantially completed or substantial completion of the contract to furnish materials, whichever is earlier”; in (a)(ii), substituted “a subcontractor” for “an employee or subcontractor” and “the contractor or other person authorized to provide direction” for “his employer or contractor”; in (b), inserted “record” and substituted “or materialman” for “journeyman or worker”; added (c) and (d); redesignated former (c) and (d) as (e) and (f); substituted “ W.S.

29-1-312

” for “ W.S.

29-1-301

” in (e); substituted “subsection (e)” for “subsection (c)” in (f); and made related change.

Basic purpose of lien statutes

is that they are intended to create a new means of securing the claims of particular classes of creditors and to prevent unjust enrichment arising from the enhancement in value of property from work and materials expended thereon which would otherwise go without payment. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

Basic principle underlying all mechanics' lien statutes is one of equity,

that unconscionable and unjust enrichment should be prevented in the field of construction. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

Strict compliance with statutory requirements mandatory. —

Since the mechanic's lien is a statutory creature in derogation of the common law, strict compliance with statutory requirements is mandatory. Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mountain Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980). See, also, Sargent v. Delgado, 492 P.2d 193,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1972).

To establish valid lien, there must be full compliance with statutory requirements.

Foster Lumber Co. v. Hume, 645 P.2d 1176,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo. 1982).

Materialman may be contractor,

and he is, in fact, a contractor if he furnished the material on a contract with the owner. Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1938).

Timely and proper action necessary. —

An incumbrance created during progress of construction is obtained with notice that the builder will be entitled to a superior lien providing only that timely and proper action is taken to establish the same. Sawyer v. Sawyer, 79 Wyo. 489, 335 P.2d 794,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1959).

Lien claim must be filed within time limited by this section.

Foster Lumber Co. v. Hume, 645 P.2d 1176,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo. 1982).

District court
erred in enforcing a material lien a supplier filed against owners'
property because the lien was not timely as a matter of law since
it was not filed within ninety days of the substantial completion
date the district court found; the earlier date of substantial completion
the district court found and not the date the supplier last provided
materials began the period during which it could file its lien statement. Bates v. Chi. Lumber Co., 2016 WY 58, 375 P.3d 732,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2016).

Compromise valid on last day. —

In a dispute regarding a mechanics' lien, delivery of a lien waiver on the last day that a lien statement could have been filed constituted a compromise and settlement because the elements of a contract were satisfied; economic duress was rejected as a defense because, considering the relatively small amount of money involved, a reasonable alternative, expedited review under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

29-1-311

, existed. Dobson v. Portrait Homes, Inc., 2005 WY 95, 117 P.3d 1200,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2005).

Company furnishing materials for construction, but not installing materials, deemed “materialman,” not “contractor.” —

A company who entered a contract with the record owner of real property to furnish materials for the construction of a home on the property, but installed no materials into the new home, was a “materialman,” not a “contractor,” and had to file its lien statement within the 90-day time period provided by subsection (a). Weyerhaeuser Co. v. Walters, 707 P.2d 733,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 585

(Wyo. 1985).

Lien not abrogated when owner prevents completion. —

Where an improvement is abandoned by the owner or where the completion is otherwise rendered impossible by the owner, the right to a lien is not abrogated. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Completion of contract causes debt to accrue.

Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Accrual of debt when restraining order prevents completion. —

The bank's action in obtaining a restraining order effectively prevented completion, and the debt accrued at such time as the parties gained knowledge of the restraining order. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Inclusion in description of more land than lien may attach does not vitiate lien

upon so much of the land as the lien may attach. Engle v. First Nat'l Bank, 590 P.2d 826,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1979).

Superintendent's lien for services. —

Superintendent and engineer in charge of construction of plant who also performed work and labor was entitled to lien for his salary. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

Date of completion starts running of period for filing.

Frontier Plumbing & Heating Co. v. Fitch, 480 P.2d 398,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1971).

Where last materials for job were delivered June 15, 1912, though not actually used, and accounts were kept open continuously until that date, lien statement was properly filed within 90 days from that time. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

And performing omitted part of contract cannot extend it. —

When a building is substantially complete and is accepted by the owner, the contractor cannot thereafter, at his own instance, perform some omitted part of the contract and thereby extend the period for filing the lien. Arch Sellery, Inc. v. Simpson, 346 P.2d 1068,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1959).

A contractor cannot after completing work, at his own instance and against the will of the owner, perform some part that was called for in the contract, but which had been omitted in the construction, and thereby extend the period for filing his lien. Frontier Plumbing & Heating Co. v. Fitch, 480 P.2d 398,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1971).

But supplementary work may extend lien. —

Custom, usage and practice in the building industry can serve to show that supplementary work on a building contract done within the 90-day limitation fixed by the legislature for filing a lien under this section was in fact considered an integral part of the contract by the parties, thus extending the lien. Arch Sellery, Inc. v. Simpson, 360 P.2d 911,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1961).

Determination by trier. —

Generally it is for the trier to determine whether the additional work was minor and casual or long after the job was completed. Frontier Plumbing & Heating Co. v. Fitch, 480 P.2d 398,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1971).

It is for the trier to determine whether additional work is minor and incidental, rather than substantial, and his determination will not be disturbed if the evidence reasonably supports him. Frontier Plumbing & Heating Co. v. Fitch, 480 P.2d 398,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1971).

Mechanical lien held invalid and unenforceable because of premature filing

where a notice of lien was filed prior to the passage of 60 days from the installation of material needed for completion of the job. Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mountain Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

Limitation in bond on commencement of action. —

Building contractor's bond, contract and facts must be considered to determine whether limitation in bond on commencement of action is reasonable. American Sur. Co. v. Broadway Improvement & Inv. Co., 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1929).

Contractor's bond provision against suit on bond later than specified date held applicable only if building were completed by date specified. American Sur. Co. v. Broadway Improvement & Inv. Co., 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1929).

Discrepancy in lien statement as to date

materials were furnished was immaterial where no one was mislead thereby, though the statement would have been filed too late if the date mentioned therein had been the correct date. Phelan v. Cheyenne Brick Co., 26 Wyo. 493, 188 P. 354,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 26 Wyo. 493, 189 P. 1103,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1920).

Amendment of pleading

to assert mechanic's lien as a contractor instead of as subcontractor made more than 6 months after filing of lien statement held barred under this section. McDonald Amusement Co. v. Fleming Bros. Lumber Co., 35 F.2d 638, 1929 U.S. App. LEXIS 3035 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1929) (decided prior to Rule 15, W.R.C.P.).

Item to be subject of lien. —

Lien for materials furnished cannot be computed from date of last item in claimant's account unless such item was the subject of a lien. Mawson-Peterson Lumber Co. v. Sprinkle, 59 Wyo. 334, 140 P.2d 588,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1943).

Stove parts,

not being parts of fixture, from face of account are not lienable; to bring filing of lien statement within 4 month period, burden to show items lienable is upon claimant, by proof thereof that is reasonably clear. Mawson-Peterson Lumber Co. v. Sprinkle, 59 Wyo. 334, 140 P.2d 588,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1943).

Where lien claimant failed to establish that “stove parts,” which on their face are not lienable, were lienable items in his case, judgment for claimant was not sustained. Mawson-Peterson Lumber Co. v. Sprinkle, 59 Wyo. 334, 140 P.2d 588,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1943).

Provisions for retaining percentages. —

Building contract and surety bond provisions for retaining percentages held inapplicable to building material on premises when contract was executed. American Sur. Co. v. Broadway Improvement & Inv. Co., 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1929).

Lien statement insufficient for failure to describe materials furnished. —

Where no attempt is made in the lien statement to describe the “materials and supplies” furnished, nor any indication given of the type of services rendered, the lien statement is insufficient to satisfy the statutory requirement of a “just and true account of the demand.” Union Mfg. & Supply Co. v. Groff, 624 F.2d 133, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 16585 (10th Cir. 1980).

Inaccuracies in lien statement. —

A lien statement may be regarded as just and true, so as not to vitiate the entire lien, even if it contains mistakes or errors of omission and includes nonlienable items of charge, if those inaccuracies of fact are unintentional and are the result of honest inadvertence, accident or oversight and do not result from deliberate intention or design. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

In the absence of any showing of fraud or bad faith, and where the nonlienable items are separable from the balance of the account and their inclusion is through inadvertence, or is the result of an honest mistake and no one has been injured or misled thereby, it is ruled that such inclusion does not invalidate the entire lien. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

But when nonlienable items are included in a lien statement deliberately, knowingly and intentionally, then the account so filed may not be regarded as just and true within the meaning of this section and can form no basis for the adjudication and establishment of a lien for any part of the account. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

Mistaken inclusion of nonlienable items does not invalidate lien. —

In the absence of any showing of fraud or bad faith, and where nonlienable items are separable from the balance of an account and their inclusion is through inadvertence or is the result of an honest mistake and no one has been injured or misled thereby, such inclusion does not invalidate the entire mechanics' lien. Kirby Bldg. Sys. v. Independence Partnership No. One, 634 P.2d 342,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1981).

Burden of separating nonlienable items. —

If lienable items can be separated from those which are nonlienable in a foreclosure proceeding, the burden of doing so is on the claimant. United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Martin & Luther Gen. Contractors, 455 P.2d 664,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1969).

Word “owner”

in this section means the owner at the time the statement is made and filed. Davis v. Big Horn Lumber Co., 14 Wyo. 517, 85 P. 980,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1906).

The word “owner” means the party in interest who is the source of authority for the improvement, and one who deals with such party directly is contracting with the owner, not a subcontractor, and is an original contractor. Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1938).

Where wife not made party. —

Subcontractor was not entitled to foreclose mechanic's lien against property held by husband and wife by entirety by virtue of deed recorded 2 months after filing of lien statement in which wife was not named where wife was not made party to suit to foreclose until 3 years after filing lien statement. Peters v. Dona, 49 Wyo. 306, 54 P.2d 817,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1936).

Contract authorizing filing of lien may be either express or implied. —

In order to authorize the filing of a lien under §

29-2-102

, the existence of a contract is necessary, but it may be either express or implied. Arch Sellery, Inc. v. Simpson, 346 P.2d 1068,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1959).

Neglect to require bond. —

Neglect of school board to require building contractor to give bond against mechanics' liens, provided for by the contract, did not make school district liable to the subcontractor for material furnished and used on the building. Peters v. Killibrew, 24 Wyo. 53, 154 P. 996,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1916).

Quoted

in

American Bldgs. Co. v. Wheelers Stores, 585 P.2d 845,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1978); P & N Invs, LLC v. Frontier Mall Assocs., LP, 2017 WY 62, 395 P.3d 1101,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Big Horn Lumber Co. v. Davis, 14 Wyo. 455, 84 P. 900,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1906).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and effect of contract against mechanics' liens, 76 ALR2d 1087.

Contract between owner and principal contractor against lien as affecting right of subcontractor's and materialman's lien, 76 ALR2d 1087.

Provision against mechanic's lien in contract between principal contractor and subcontractor as affecting subcontractor's lien, 76 ALR2d 1087, 75 ALR3d 505.

Abandonment of construction or contract as affecting time for filing mechanics' liens, 52 ALR3d 797.

Release or waiver of mechanic's lien by general contractor as affecting rights of subcontractor or materialman, 75 ALR3d 505.

Liability of purchaser of real estate on mechanic's lien based on goods or labor supplied to vendor but filed after title passed, 33 ALR4th 1017.

Unjust enrichment of landowner based on adjoining landowner's construction, improvement, or repair of commonly used highway, street, or bridge, 22 ALR5th 800.

Timeliness of notice to public works contractor on federal project, of indebtedness for labor or materials furnished, 69 ALR Fed 600.

§ 29-2-107.
Notice of intention to file lien.

Before filing a lien pursuant to this chapter a lien claimant shall send written notice to the record owner or his agent of any claim against real property, a building or an improvement stating the amount of any claim and from whom it is due. The notice shall be sent no later than twenty (20) days prior to filing a lien statement.

The notice under this section shall be in substantially the same format and contain the same information as the notice form specified in W.S.

29-10-102

. The notice forms shall be made available and may be obtained at the county clerk’s office of each county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 1534; R.S. 1899, § 2905; C.S. 1910, § 3815; C.S. 1920, § 4879; R.S. 1931, § 66-521; C.S. 1945, § 55-219; W.S. 1957, § 29-12; W.S. 1977, §

29-2-110

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “a lien claimant shall send written notice to the record owner or his agent of any claim against real property, a building or an improvement” for “every person shall give ten (10) days notice to the owner or his agent in writing of any claim against a building or an improvement or for materials furnished” and added second sentence; and added (b).

Main object of preliminary notice of lienable demand,

which this section requires a subcontractor to give to a property owner, is to warn the latter against paying the original contractor while outstanding claims exist in favor of laborers and materialmen. Kirby Bldg. Sys. v. Independence Partnership No. One, 634 P.2d 342,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1981).

Notice to put reasonable person on notice of claim. —

Notice of a mechanics' lien, absent a showing of bad faith, must contain sufficient information so as to put a reasonable person on notice of the nature of the claim. Kirby Bldg. Sys. v. Independence Partnership No. One, 634 P.2d 342,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1981).

To assert inadequacy of notice, party must establish that he has been misled.

Kirby Bldg. Sys. v. Independence Partnership No. One, 634 P.2d 342,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1981).

Notice sent to present owners of property. —

Inasmuch as the lien claimant failed to comply with the statutory requirement of giving proper notice to the owners of the property at the time the notice of intention to file lien was sent, although these parties were not the record owners at the time the claimant entered into a contract to supply materials to the then record owner, the lien was ineffective. Weyerhaeuser Co. v. Walters, 707 P.2d 733,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 585

(Wyo. 1985).

Evidence of notice. —

In suit to enforce mechanic's lien, a stipulation, made to avoid continuance, that an absent witness, if present, would testify that notice of the claim and of the intention to file a lien was served on defendants, of which notice a copy was attached and marked “B,” constituted sufficient evidence of notice of intention to file lien, without formally offering the notice in evidence. Phelan v. Cheyenne Brick Co., 26 Wyo. 493, 188 P. 354,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 26 Wyo. 493, 189 P. 1103,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1920).

Notice requirement waived unless raised at trial. —

The ten days notice is a requirement of this section, but it is waived unless the issue is raised in the trial court. Schaefer v. Lampert Lumber Co., 591 P.2d 1225,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1979).

Where wife not made party. —

Subcontractor was not entitled to foreclose mechanic's lien against property held by husband and wife by entirety through deed recorded 2 months after filing of lien statement wherein wife was not named and wife was not made party to foreclosure suit until over 3 years after filing lien statement. Peters v. Dona, 49 Wyo. 306, 54 P.2d 817,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1936).

Quoted

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Jordan v. Natrona Lumber Co., 52 Wyo. 393, 75 P.2d 378,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1938); True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., Inc., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978); Foster Lumber Co. v. Hume, 645 P.2d 1176,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo. 1982); Orcutt v. Shober Invs., Inc., 2003 WY 60, 69 P.3d 386,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2003); Keith L. Dobson & Aspen Constr. Co. v. Portrait Homes, Inc., 2005 WY 95, 117 P.3d 1200,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of notice, claim or statement of mechanic's lien with respect to nature of work, 27 ALR2d 1169.

Sufficiency of notice, claim or statement of mechanic's lien with respect to description or location of real property, 52 ALR2d 12.

Sale of real property as affecting time for filing notice of or perfecting mechanic's lien as against purchaser's interest, 76 ALR2d 1163.

Time for filing notice or claim of mechanic's lien where claimant has contracted with general contractor and later contracts directly with owner, 78 ALR2d 1165.

Sufficiency of designation of owner in notice, claim or statement of mechanic's lien, 48 ALR3d 153.

Abandonment of construction or of contract as affecting time for filing mechanics' liens or time for giving notice to owner, 52 ALR3d 797.

Liability of purchaser of real estate on mechanic's lien based on goods or labor supplied to vendor but filed after title passed, 33 ALR4th 1017.

Unjust enrichment of landowner based on adjoining landowner's construction, improvement, or repair of commonly used highway, street, or bridge, 22 ALR5th 800.

§ 29-2-108.
Duty of contractor to defend action; liability of contractor to owner.

The contractor shall, at his own expense, defend any action brought by his employee, subcontractors hired by the contractor, their employees or by any suppliers of materials provided under contract in accordance with this chapter. During the pendency of the action the owner or his agent may withhold from the contractor the amount of money for which a lien is filed. If judgment is rendered against the owner or his property on the lien foreclosure, he may deduct from any amount due to the contractor the amount of the judgment and costs. If the owner has paid the contractor in full he may recover from the contractor any amount paid by the owner for which the contractor was originally liable.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 81, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 1535; R.S. 1899, § 2906; C.S. 1910, § 3816; C.S. 1920, § 4880; R.S. 1931, § 66-522; C.S. 1945, § 55-220; W.S. 1957, § 29-17; W.S. 1977, § 29-2-115; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted “at his own expense” near the beginning and deleted “at his own expense” at the end of the first sentence.

Nature of lien foreclosure action. —

Even though the mechanics' lien statutes authorize the entry of personal judgments against the contractor-debtor under this section a lien foreclosure action, resulting in such judgments, cannot be considered an action “for the recovery of money only, or specific real or personal property,” within the meaning of Rule 38 (a), W.R.C.P. An action for foreclosure of a mechanic's lien is an equitable proceeding and, as contemplated by Rule 38 (a), W.R.C.P., should be triable by the court without a jury. It is principally an action to bind the property of the owner whose premises have been improved by the labor or materials furnished by the lien claimant for that purpose. True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Owner's right to have contractor made party. —

The provisions of this section were evidently incorporated for the owner's protection, and to accomplish the full purpose thereof, the owner has a clear right to insist that the contractor be made a party, if possible, so that he may be bound by the judgment. While no personal judgment can be rendered against the contractor in such a suit unless there has been service of summons upon him within the state, he may nevertheless, if a nonresident of the state, be brought in as a party, for the statutes provided for constructive service in such a case pursuant to § 29-2-116.True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Because a lien foreclosure action by a subcontractor was an in rem action against the owner and did not require the presence of either the bankrupt contractor or its alleged joint venturer, Wyo. R. Civ. P. 19 and this section did not preclude the district court from granting summary judgment to the subcontractor in their absence; moreover, the automatic stay of 11 U.S.C.S. § 362(a) did not apply to the proceedings against the solvent owner.
KM Upstream, LLC v. Elkhorn Constr., Inc., 2012 WY 79, 278 P.3d 711,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2012).

Time for foreclosing mechanic's lien against owner not stayed by contractor's bankruptcy. —

A contractor is not an indispensable party to a lien foreclosure unless the owner of the property subject to lien wants him joined. Since the employees of a contractor who filed for bankruptcy untimely filed their suit for foreclosure of a mechanic's lien, and since the contractor was not an indispensable party, the automatic stay granted the contractor by federal law did not stay foreclosure against the owner under either state or federal law, and the employees had no lien at the time of filing their action. Hamel v. American Continental Corp., 713 P.2d 1152,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

American Sur. Co. v. Broadway Improvement & Inv. Co., 39 Wyo. 195, 271 P. 19,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(1928); Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 29-2-109.
Limitation of actions; duration of liens.

All actions to foreclose or enforce a lien under this chapter shall be commenced within one hundred eighty (180) days after the filing of the lien statement. No lien shall continue to exist except by virtue of the provisions of this chapter for more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the lien is filed unless an action to foreclose the lien is instituted.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 80, § 15; 1886, ch. 25, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1531; R.S. 1899, § 2902; C.S. 1910, § 3812; C.S. 1920, § 4876; R.S. 1931, § 66-518; C.S. 1945, § 55-216; W.S. 1957, § 29-25; W.S. 1977, § 29-2-123; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Cross references. —

For other important time periods under this title, see also §§

29-2-106

,

29-3-109

,

29-5-103

, and

29-5-105

.

Superintendent's lien for services. —

Superintendent and engineer in charge of construction of plant who also performed work and labor was entitled to lien for his salary. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

Timely filing of lien statement. —

Where last materials for job were delivered June 15, 1912, though not actually used, and accounts were kept open continuously until that date, lien statement was properly filed within 90 days from that time. Continental & Commercial Trust & Sav. Bank v. North Platte Valley Irr. Co., 219 F. 438, 1915 U.S. App. LEXIS 1639 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1915).

Lapse of lien. —

Unless suit to foreclose mechanic's lien is instituted within 6 months against owner of the premises, the lien lapses and the court is without jurisdiction to proceed with the foreclosure. Peters v. Dona, 49 Wyo. 306, 54 P.2d 817,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1936).

Indispensible party's bankruptcy tolls lien foreclosurer. —

Where a corporate debtor-landowner was an indispensable party to a foreclosure action against nondebtor mortgage holders, an architect's amended petition to foreclose his lien was subject to the automatic stay of the federal Bankruptcy Code, and this section was tolled during the pendency of the debtor's bankruptcy proceedings. Diamond Hill Inv. Co. v. Shelden, 767 P.2d 1005,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1989).

Time for foreclosing mechanic's lien against owner not stayed by contractor's bankruptcy. —

A contractor is not an indispensable party to a lien foreclosure unless the owner of the property subject to lien wants him joined. Since the employees of a contractor who filed for bankruptcy untimely filed their suit for foreclosure of a mechanic's lien, and since the contractor was not an indispensable party, the automatic stay granted the contractor by federal law did not stay foreclosure against the owner under either state or federal law, and the employees had no lien at the time of filing their action. Hamel v. American Continental Corp., 713 P.2d 1152,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1986).

Where wife not made party. —

Subcontractor was not entitled to foreclose mechanic's lien against property held by husband and wife by entirety through deed recorded 2 months after filing of lien statement wherein wife was not named and wife was not made party to foreclosure suit until over 3 years after filing lien statement. Peters v. Dona, 49 Wyo. 306, 54 P.2d 817,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1936).

Mortgagee interest holder, not sued within limitation period, not affected by lien. —

No action was brought within 180 days after the filing of the lien statement to foreclose the interest of the mortgage interest holder, and thus the lien could not affect its interest. The fact that a suit was commenced within 180 days against the owners of the property, to whom the statute of limitations defense was not available, was irrelevant. Seafirst Mortgage Corp. v. Specialty Concrete Constr., 708 P.2d 1245,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 607

(Wyo. 1985).

Amendment of pleading

to assert mechanic's lien as a contractor instead of as subcontractor made more than 6 months after filing of lien statement held barred under this section. McDonald Amusement Co. v. Fleming Bros. Lumber Co., 35 F.2d 638, 1929 U.S. App. LEXIS 3035 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1929) (decided prior to Rule 15, W.R.C.P.).

Cited

in

Tottenhoff v. Rocky Mt. Constr. Co., 609 P.2d 464,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1980); Miller v. State, 732 P.2d 1054,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 395

(Wyo. 1987).

§§ 29-2-110 and 29-2-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 177, § 1, related to notice to owner; limitations; condition precedent to lien.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 29-2-112.
Preliminary notices.

With respect to perfecting the right to file a construction lien under this chapter, the following preliminary notice requirements shall apply:

The contractor, subcontractor and materialman shall send written notice to the record owner or his agent, of the right to assert a lien against the property for which services or materials are provided if the contractor, subcontractor or materialman is not paid, and the right of the owner or contractor to obtain a lien waiver upon payment for services or materials. Each subcontractor and materialman shall provide a copy of the written notice to the contractor for which the subcontractor or materialman is providing services or materials;

Any notice required under this section shall be sent:

By the contractor prior to receiving any payment from owner, including advances;

By the subcontractor or materialman within thirty (30) days after first providing services or materials to the construction project.

Failure to send the notice required under this section within the time specified shall bar the right of a contractor, subcontractor or materialman to assert a lien;

The notice required under this section shall be in substantially the same format and contain the same information as the notice contained in W.S.

29-10-101

. The form shall be made available and may be obtained at the county clerk’s office of each county.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Cited in

Bates v. Chi. Lumber Co., 2016 WY 58, 375 P.3d 732,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated in

CSC Grp. Holdings, LLC v. Automation & Elecs., Inc., 2016 WY 26, 368 P.3d 302,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 29-2-113.
Identity of record owner or his agent provided.

The contractor shall provide to subcontractors and materialmen at the time of contracting with them the name and address of the record owner and his agent, if applicable, and legal description of the site of the project on which work will be performed or materials furnished.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.